Utah statutes.
65A-10-1.   Authority of division to manage sovereign lands.

(1)  The division is the management authority for sovereign lands, and may exchange, sell, or lease sovereign lands but only in the quantities and for the purposes as serve the public interest and do not interfere with the public trust.

(2)  Nothing in this section shall be construed as asserting state ownership of the beds of nonnavigable lakes, bays, rivers, or streams.

